Hawaii statutes.
[§30-5] Budgetary information to be given
governor-elect. If the governor under whose supervision the budget report
has been prepared will be succeeded in office in December next following:

(1) The director of finance shall make available to
the governor-elect so much as the governor-elect requests of the information
upon which the governor's budget report is based, and upon completion of the
governor's budget report shall supply the governor-elect with a copy thereof.
The director of finance shall also make available all facilities reasonably
necessary to permit the governor-elect to review and familiarize oneself with
the governor's budget report.

(2) After a review of the governor's budget, the
governor-elect may prepare revisions and additions thereto. The director of
finance shall assist, upon request, in the preparation of such revisions or
additions.

(3) The director of finance shall have as many copies
of the revised budget report printed as the governor-elect requests.

(4) The director of finance shall compile a summary
of the revised budget report containing the revenue and expenditure
recommendations of the governor-elect and if requested by the governor-elect
may transmit a copy of the revised budget report to each member of the legislature.

(5) Upon request, the director of finance shall
distribute copies of the revised budget report, to public libraries, schools,
and state officials. The director of finance shall make a reasonable number of
copies of the revised budget report available to the general public. [L 1972, c
126, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next